Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-303
Eligibility to register as electronic notary public; Secretary of State; powers.

(1) To be eligible to register as an electronic notary public, a person shall:

(a) Hold a valid commission as a notary public in the State of Nebraska;

(b) Satisfy the education requirement of section 64-305; and

(c) Pay the fee required under section 64-306.

(2) The Secretary of State shall not accept the registration if the requirements of subsection (1) of this section are not met.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 3.